Tennessee, session 114, HB0434.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 8, Chapter 50, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Public facility" means real property owned by, or the acquisition,
construction, maintenance, or operation of which is funded in whole or in part by,
this state or a subdivision of this state; and
(2) "Public official" means a person elected to local public office or any
person appointed or employed by a local government.
(b) A public facility shall not be named or designated for an individual public
official during the public official's term of office or during the two-year period immediately
following the public official's departure from office unless private funds are used to cover
the costs of naming or designating the public facility. The two-year limitation in this
subsection (b) does not apply if the public official is deceased or an honorably
discharged veteran of the United States armed forces.
(c) A public official shall not make charitable donations in the name of the public
official if the public official is using public funds. Such donations must be attributed to
the public entity from which the funds originated.
(d) A public facility shall not be named for a public official who has been
convicted of a felony or a crime of moral turpitude.
HB0434
001031
- 1 -

(e) A public facility that has been named for a person who was not a public
official at the time of the naming may continue to bear that name if the person
subsequently becomes a public official.
(f) A public facility named for a public official prior to the effective date of this act
may continue to bear the name of that public official.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 001031